New Jersey, session 222, A4687.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 2[1. N.J.S.40A:2-22 is amended to read as follows: 40A:2-22.  The governing body of the local unit shall determine the period of usefulness of any purpose according to its reasonable life computed from the date of the bonds, which period shall not be greater than the following: a.    Buildings and structures. 1.    Bridges, including retaining walls and approaches, or permanent structures of brick, stone, concrete or metal, or similar durable construction, 30 years. 2.    Buildings, including the original furnishings and equipment therefor: Class A:     A building, of which all walls, floors, partitions, stairs and roof are wholly of incombustible material, except the window frames, doors, top flooring and wooden handrails on the stairs, 40 years; Class B:     A building, the outer walls of which are wholly of incombustible material, except the window frames and doors, 30 years; Class C:     A building which does not meet the requirements of Class A or Class B, 20 years. 3.    Buildings or structures acquired substantially reconstructed or additions thereto, one-half the period fixed in this subsection for such buildings or structures. 4.    Additional furnishings, five years. b.    Marine improvements. 1.    Harbor improvements, docks or marine terminals, 40 years. 2.    Dikes, bulkheads, jetties or similar devices of stone, concrete or metal, 15 years; of wood or partly of wood, 10 years. c.    Additional equipment and machinery. 1.    Additional or replacement equipment and machinery, 15 years. 2.    Voting machines, 15 years. 3.    Information technology and telecommunications equipment, seven years, except that for items with a unit cost of less than $5,000, five years. d.    Real property. 1.    Acquisition for any public purpose of lands or riparian rights, or both, and the original dredging, grading, draining or planting thereof, 40 years. 2.    Improvement of airport, cemetery, golf course, park, playground, 15 years. 3.    Stadia of concrete or other incombustible materials, 20 years. e.    Streets or thoroughfares. 1.    Elimination of grade crossings, 35 years. 2.    Streets or roads: Class A:     Rigid pavement. A pavement of not less than eight inches of cement concrete or a six-inch cement concrete base with not less than three-inch bituminous concrete surface course, or equivalent wearing surface, 20 years. Flexible pavement.  A pavement not less than 10 inches in depth consisting of five-inch macadam base, three-inch modified penetration macadam and three-inch bituminous concrete surface course or other pavements of equivalent strength, in accordance with the findings of the American Association of State Highway Officials (AASHO) Road Test, 20 years. Class B:     Mixed surface-treated road.  An eight-inch surface of gravel, stone or other selected material under partial control mixed with cement or lime and fly ash, six inches in compacted thickness with bituminous surface treatment and cover, 10 years. Bituminous penetration road. A five-inch gravel or stone base course and a three-inch course bound with a bituminous or equivalent binder, 10 years. Class C:     Mixed bituminous road.  An eight-inch surface of gravel, stone, or other selected material under partial control mixed with bituminous material one inch or more in compacted thickness, five years. Penetration macadam road.  A road of sand, gravel or water-bound macadam, or surfacing with penetration macadam, five years. 3.    Sidewalks, curbs and gutters of stone, concrete or brick, 10 years. The period of usefulness in this subsection shall apply to construction and reconstruction of streets and thoroughfares. f.     Utilities and municipal systems. 1.    Sewerage system, whether sanitary or storm water, water supply or distribution system, 40 years. 2.    Electric light, power or gas systems, garbage, refuse or ashes incinerator or disposal plant, 25 years. 3.    Communication and signal systems, 10 years. 4.    Service connections to publicly-owned gas, water or sewerage systems from the service main in the street to the curb or property lines where not part of original installation, five years. 5.    Service connections to publicly-owned water systems, from the distribution main onto privately-owned real property and into the privately-owned structure, for the purpose of replacing residential, commercial, and institutional lead service lines, 30 years. g.    Vehicles and apparatus. 1.    Fire engines, apparatus and equipment, when purchased new 1, lease-purchased,1 or leased, but not fire equipment purchased separately, 20 years. 2.    Automotive vehicles, including original apparatus and equipment, when purchased new, five years for vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) below 15,000 pounds, and 10 years for vehicles with a GVWR in excess of 15,000 pounds. 3.    Major repairs, reconditioning or overhaul of fire engines and apparatus, ambulances, rescue vehicles, similar public safety vehicles, public works vehicles with a GVWR in excess of 15,000 pounds, and heavy construction equipment with a weight in excess of 10,000 pounds, which may reasonably be expected to extend for at least five years the period of usefulness thereof, five years. 4.    Alternative fuel automotive vehicles, including but not limited to, electric vehicles, plug-in hybrid vehicles, hydrogen fuel cell vehicles, natural gas vehicles, and propane vehicles, when purchased new, five years. h.    The closure of a sanitary landfill facility utilized, owned or operated by a county or municipality, 15 years; provided that the closure has been approved by the Board of Public Utilities and the Department of Environmental Protection.  For the purposes of this subsection "closure" means all activities associated with the design, purchase or construction of all measures required by the Department of Environmental Protection, pursuant to law, in order to prevent, minimize or monitor pollution or health hazards resulting from sanitary landfill facilities subsequent to the termination of operations at any portion thereof, including, but not necessarily limited to, the costs of the placement of earthen or vegetative cover, and the installation of methane gas vents or monitors and leachate monitoring wells or collection systems at the site of any sanitary landfill facility. i.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2007, c.62) j.     The prefunding of a claims account for environmental liability claims by an environmental impairment liability insurance pool pursuant to P.L.1993, c.269 (C.40A:10-38.1 et al.), 20 years. k.    As used in this section: "Alternative fuel automotive vehicle" means any passenger car, station wagon, or other motor vehicle that is not solely propelled by gasoline or diesel fuel. "Electric vehicle" means any passenger car, station wagon, or other motor vehicle that is propelled solely by an electric motor or energy storage device. "Gross vehicle weight rating" or "GVWR" means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a single or combination (articulated) vehicle.  The GVWR of a combination (articulated) vehicle, commonly referred to as the "gross combination weight rating" or "GCWR," is the GVWR of the power unit plus the GVWR of the towed unit or units. "Hydrogen fuel cell vehicle" means any passenger car, station wagon, or other motor vehicle that is propelled by power derived from one or more cells that convert chemical energy directly into electricity by combining oxygen with hydrogen fuel. "Plug-in hybrid vehicle" means any passenger car, station wagon, or other motor vehicle that can be charged from a source of electricity external to the vehicle through an electric plug, but which is not solely powered by electricity. (cf: P.L.2023, c.333, s.1)]2 2[12.] 1.2  Section 1 of P.L.1981, c.188 (C.40A:14-86.1) is amended to read as follows: The board of commissioners of a fire district, following the authorization by voters of the issuance of bonds pursuant to N.J.S.40A:14-86, may by resolution borrow money and issue negotiable notes in anticipation of the bond issue.  Any note shall be designated a "bond anticipation note" and shall contain a recital that it is issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds. Such notes may be issued for a period not to exceed [1] one year, and may be renewed from time to time not to exceed [1] one year;  but all such notes, including renewals, shall mature and be paid not later than the [third] 10th anniversary of the date of the original notes;  provided, however, that no notes shall be renewed beyond the first anniversary date of the original notes unless an amount of such notes, at least equal to the first legally payable installment of the bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued is paid and retired on or before the second anniversary date, and if the notes are renewed beyond the second anniversary date of the original notes, a like amount is paid or retired on or before the [third] 10th anniversary date from funds other than the proceeds of obligations;  except that the notes shall mature and be paid not later than the first day of the fifth month following the close of the [third] 10th fiscal year next following the date of the original notes, provided that, in addition to amounts paid and retired pursuant to this section, an amount of such notes equal to not  less than the first legally payable installment of the bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued has been paid and retired not later than the end of the [third] 10th fiscal year from funds other than the proceeds of obligations. The period of usefulness as defined in N.J.S.40A:2-22 of any purpose for which bonds are issued shall include the period during which notes issued in anticipation of such bonds are outstanding, including all renewals thereof. Funds derived from the issuance of fire district bonds may be used to redeem notes issued in anticipation of the bond issue.1 (cf: P.L.1981, c.188, s.1) 22.   Section 24 of P.L.1983, c.313 (C.40A:5A-24) is amended to read as follows: a.    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any authority, in anticipation of the issuance of bonds, may borrow money and issue temporary obligations if the bond resolution so provides.  A temporary obligation shall be designated "bond anticipation note" or "project note" and shall contain a recital that it is issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds.  [At] For all authorities except fire districts, any time within three years of the date of the original note issue, the authority may renew the notes, provided that a form prescribed by the director listing the terms and conditions of the renewals is submitted to the director and the director fails to disapprove the renewal in writing within 10 days of the date of its receipt.  If the renewal is disapproved by the director, the Local Finance Board shall hold a hearing as set forth in section 7 of P.L.1983, c. 313 (C. 40A:5A-7).  Any application for a renewal after three years from the date of the original issue shall be submitted and subject to the approval and conditions of the Local Finance Board. b.    The issuance of temporary obligations by a fire district shall be pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1981, c.188 (C. 40A:14-86.1). The terms and conditions of note renewals shall be submitted to the director for approval following the procedure set forth in subsection a. of this section.  If the renewal is disapproved by the director, the Local Finance Board shall hold a hearing as set forth in section 7 of P.L.1983, c.313 (C. 40A:5A-7).2 (cf: P.L.1987, c.319, s.11) 23.   Section 15 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-15) is amended to read as follows: 15.  All contracts for the provision or performance of goods or services shall be awarded for a period not to exceed 24 consecutive months, except that contracts for professional services pursuant to subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 5 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-5) shall be awarded for a period not to exceed 12 consecutive months.  Contracts may be awarded for longer periods of time as follows: (1)  Supplying of: (a)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1996, c.113[.]) (b)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1996, c.113[.]) (c)   Thermal energy produced by a cogeneration facility, for use for heating or air conditioning or both, for any term not exceeding 40 years, when the contract is approved by the Board of Public Utilities. For the purposes of this paragraph, "cogeneration" means the simultaneous production in one facility of electric power and other forms of useful energy such as heating or process steam; (2)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1977, c.53[.]) (3)  The collection and disposal of municipal solid waste, the collection and disposition of recyclable material, or the disposal of sewage sludge, for any term not exceeding in the aggregate, five years; (4)  The collection and recycling of methane gas from a sanitary landfill facility, for any term not exceeding 25 years, when the contract is in conformance with a district solid waste management plan approved pursuant to P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.), and with the approval of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs and the Department of Environmental Protection. The contracting unit shall award the contract to the highest responsible bidder, notwithstanding that the contract price may be in excess of the amount of any necessarily related administrative expenses; except that if the contract requires the contracting unit to expend funds only, the contracting unit shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.  The approval by the Division of Local Government Services of public bidding requirements shall not be required for those contracts exempted therefrom pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-5); (5)  Data processing service, for any term of not more than seven years; (6)  Insurance, including the purchase of insurance coverages, insurance consulting or administrative services, claims administration services, including participation in a joint self-insurance fund, risk management program or related services provided by a contracting unit insurance group, or participation in an insurance fund established by a local unit pursuant to N.J.S.40A:10-6, or a joint insurance fund established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.372 (C.40A:10-36 et seq.), for any term of not more than three years; (7)  Leasing or servicing of (a) automobiles, motor vehicles, machinery, and equipment of every nature and kind, except for new fire engines and apparatus, for a period not to exceed five years, or (b) machinery and equipment used in the generation of electricity by a municipal shared services energy authority established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2015, c.129 (C.40A:66-4), or a contracting unit engaged in the generation of electricity, for a period not to exceed 20 years, or (c) new fire engines and apparatus, including fire equipment together with new fire engines or apparatus, for a period not to exceed 20 years; provided, however, a contract shall be awarded only subject to and in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs; (8)  The supplying of any product or the rendering of any service by a company providing voice, data, transmission, or switching services for a term not exceeding five years; (9)  Any single project for the construction, reconstruction, or rehabilitation of any public building, structure, or facility, or any public works project, including the retention of the services of any architect or engineer in connection therewith, for the length of time authorized and necessary for the completion of the actual construction; (10) The providing of food services for any term not exceeding three years; (11) On-site inspections and plan review services undertaken by private agencies pursuant to the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.) for any term of not more than three years; (12)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2009, c.4)[.] (13)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1999, c.440[.]) (14)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1999, c.440[.]) (15)  Leasing of motor vehicles, machinery, and other equipment primarily used to fight fires, for a term not to exceed [ten] 20 years, when the contract includes an option to purchase, subject to and in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs; (16)  The provision of water supply services or the designing, financing, construction, operation, or maintenance, or any combination thereof, of a water supply facility, or any component part or parts thereof, including a water filtration system, for a period not to exceed 40 years, when the contract for these services is approved by the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs, the Board of Public Utilities, and the Department of Environmental Protection pursuant to P.L.1985, c.37 (C.58:26-1 et al.), except that no approvals shall be required for those contracts otherwise exempted pursuant to subsection (30), (31), (34), (35) or (43) of this section. For the purposes of this subsection, "water supply services" means any service provided by a water supply facility; "water filtration system" means any equipment, plants, structures, machinery, apparatus, or land, or any combination thereof, acquired, used, constructed, rehabilitated, or operated for the collection, impoundment, storage, improvement, filtration, or other treatment of drinking water for the purposes of purifying and enhancing water quality and insuring its potability prior to the distribution of the drinking water to the general public for human consumption, including plants and works, and other personal property and appurtenances necessary for their use or operation; and "water supply facility" means and refers to the real property and the plants, structures, or interconnections between existing water supply facilities, machinery and equipment and other property, real, personal, and mixed, acquired, constructed, or operated, or to be acquired, constructed, or operated, in whole or in part by or on behalf of a political subdivision of the State or any agency thereof, for the purpose of augmenting the natural water resources of the State and making available an increased supply of water for all uses, or of conserving existing water resources, and any and all appurtenances necessary, useful, or convenient for the collecting, impounding, storing, improving, treating, filtering, conserving, or transmitting of water and for the preservation and protection of these resources and facilities and providing for the conservation and development of future water supply resources; (17)   The provision of resource recovery services by a qualified vendor, the disposal of the solid waste delivered for disposal which cannot be processed by a resource recovery facility or the residual ash generated at a resource recovery facility, including hazardous waste and recovered metals and other materials for reuse, or the design, financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a resource recovery facility for a period not to exceed 40 years when the contract is approved by the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs, and the Department of Environmental Protection pursuant to P.L.1985, c.38 (C.13:1E-136 et al.); and when the resource recovery facility is in conformance with a district solid waste management plan approved pursuant to P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.). For the purposes of this subsection, "resource recovery facility" means a solid waste facility constructed and operated for the incineration of solid waste for energy production and the recovery of metals and other materials for reuse, or a mechanized composting facility, or any other facility constructed or operated for the collection, separation, recycling, and recovery of metals, glass, paper, and other materials for reuse or for energy production; and "residual ash" means the bottom ash, fly ash, or any combination thereof, resulting from the combustion of solid waste at a resource recovery facility; (18)   The sale of electricity or thermal energy, or both, produced by a resource recovery facility for a period not to exceed 40 years when the contract is approved by the Board of Public Utilities, and when the resource recovery facility is in conformance with a district solid waste management plan approved pursuant to P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.). For the purposes of this subsection, "resource recovery facility" means a solid waste facility constructed and operated for the incineration of solid waste for energy production and the recovery of metals and other materials for reuse, or a mechanized composting facility, or any other facility constructed or operated for the collection, separation, recycling, and recovery of metals, glass, paper, and other materials for reuse or for energy production; (19)   The provision of wastewater treatment services or the designing, financing, construction, operation, or maintenance, or any combination thereof, of a wastewater treatment system, or any component part or parts thereof, for a period not to exceed 40 years, when the contract for these services is approved by the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs and the Department of Environmental Protection pursuant to P.L.1985, c.72 (C.58:27-1 et al.), except that no approvals shall be required for those contracts otherwise exempted pursuant to subsection (36) or (43) of this section. For the purposes of this subsection, "wastewater treatment services" means any services provided by a wastewater treatment system; and "wastewater treatment system" means equipment, plants, structures, machinery, apparatus, or land, or any combination thereof, acquired, used, constructed, or operated for the storage, collection, reduction, recycling, reclamation, disposal, separation, or other treatment of wastewater or sewage sludge, or for the final disposal of residues resulting from the treatment of wastewater, including, but not limited to, pumping and ventilating stations, facilities, plants and works, connections, outfall sewers, interceptors, trunk lines, and other personal property and appurtenances necessary for their operation; (20)   The supplying of goods or services for the purpose of lighting public streets, for a term not to exceed five years; (21)   The provision of emergency medical services for a term not to exceed five years; (22)   Towing and storage contracts, awarded pursuant to paragraph u. of subsection (1) of section 5 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-5) for any term not exceeding three years; (23)   Fuel for the purpose of generating electricity for a term not to exceed eight years; (24)   The purchase of electricity or administrative or dispatching services related to the transmission of electricity, from a supplier of electricity subject to the jurisdiction of a federal regulatory agency, from a qualifying small power producing facility or qualifying cogeneration facility, as defined by 16 U.S.C. s.796, or from any supplier of electricity within any regional transmission organization or independent system operator or from an organization or operator or their successors, by a contracting unit engaged in the generation of electricity for retail sale, as of May 24, 1991, for a term not to exceed 40 years; or by a contracting unit engaged solely in the distribution of electricity for retail sale for a term not to exceed ten years, except that a contract with a contracting unit, engaged solely in the distribution of electricity for retail sale, in excess of ten years, shall require the written approval of the Director of the Division of Local Government Services.  If the director fails to respond in writing to the contracting unit within 10 business days, the contract shall be deemed approved; (25)  Basic life support services, for a period not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this subsection, "basic life support" means a basic level of prehospital care, which includes but need not be limited to patient stabilization, airway clearance, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, hemorrhage control, initial wound care, and fracture stabilization; (26)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1999, c.440[.]) (27)  The provision of transportation services to an elderly person, an individual with a disability, or an indigent person for any term of not more than three years. For the purposes of this subsection, "elderly person" means a person who is 60 years of age or older.  "Individual with a disability" means a person of any age who, by reason of illness, injury, age, congenital malfunction, or other permanent or temporary incapacity or disability, is unable, without special facilities or special planning or design to utilize mass transportation facilities and services as effectively as persons who are not so affected.  "Indigent person " means a person of any age whose income does not exceed 100 percent of the poverty line, adjusted for family size, established and adjusted under section 2 of the "Community Services Block Grant Act," (42 U.S.C. s.9902); (28)   The supplying of liquid oxygen or other chemicals, for a term not to exceed five years, when the contract includes the installation of tanks or other storage facilities by the supplier, on or near the premises of the contracting unit; (29)   The performance of patient care services by contracted medical staff at county hospitals, correction facilities, and long term care facilities, for any term of not more than three years; (30)   The acquisition of an equitable interest in a water supply facility pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1993, c.381 (C.58:28-2), or a contract entered into pursuant to the "County and Municipal Water Supply Act," N.J.S.40A:31-1 et seq., if the contract is entered into no later than January 7, 1995, for any term of not more than [forty] 40 years; (31)   The provision of water supply services or the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance or any combination thereof, of a water supply facility or any component part or parts thereof, by a partnership or copartnership established pursuant to a contract authorized under section 2 of P.L.1993, c.381 (C.58:28-2), for a period not to exceed 40 years; (32)   Laundry service and the rental, supply, and cleaning of uniforms for any term of not more than three years; (33)  The supplying of any product or the rendering of any service, including consulting services, by a cemetery management company for the maintenance and preservation of a municipal cemetery operating pursuant to the "New Jersey Cemetery Act, 2003," P.L.2003, c.261 (C.45:27-1 et seq.), for a term not exceeding 15 years; (34)   A contract between a public entity and a private firm pursuant to P.L.1995, c.101 (C.58:26-19 et al.) for the provision of water supply services may be entered into for any term which, when all optional extension periods are added, may not exceed 40 years; (35)  A contract for the purchase of a supply of water from a public utility company subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Public Utilities in accordance with tariffs and schedules of charges made, charged or exacted or contracts filed with the Board of Public Utilities, for any term of not more than 40 years; (36)  A contract between a public entity and a private firm or public authority pursuant to P.L.1995, c.216 (C.58:27-19 et al.) for the provision of wastewater treatment services may be entered into for any term of not more than 40 years, including all optional extension periods; (37)  The operation and management of a facility under a license issued or permit approved by the Department of Environmental Protection, including a wastewater treatment system, a stormwater management system, or a water supply or distribution facility, as the case may be, for any term of not more than [ten] 10 years. For the purposes of this subsection, "wastewater treatment system" refers to facilities operated or maintained for the storage, collection, reduction, disposal, or other treatment of wastewater or sewage sludge, remediation of groundwater contamination, stormwater runoff, or the final disposal of residues resulting from the treatment of wastewater; "stormwater management system" means the same as that term is defined in section 3 of P.L.2019, c.42 (C.40A:26B-3); and "water supply or distribution facility" refers to facilities operated or maintained for augmenting the natural water resources of the State, increasing the supply of water, conserving existing water resources, or distributing water to users; (38)  Municipal solid waste collection from facilities owned by a contracting unit, for any term of not more than three years; (39)   Fuel for heating purposes, for any term of not more than three years; (40)   Fuel or oil for use in motor vehicles for any term of not more than three years; (41)   Plowing and removal of snow and ice for any term of not more than three years; (42)  Purchases made under a contract awarded by the Director of the Division of Purchase and Property in the Department of the Treasury for use by counties, municipalities, or other contracting units pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1969, c.104 (C.52:25-16.1), for a term not to exceed the term of that contract; (43)   A contract between the governing body of a city of the first class and a duly incorporated nonprofit association for the provision of water supply services as defined in subsection (16) of this section, or wastewater treatment services as defined in subsection (19) of this section, may be entered into for a period not to exceed 40 years; (44)  The purchase of electricity generated through Class I renewable energy or from a power production facility that is fueled by methane gas extracted from a landfill in the county of the contacting unit for any term not exceeding 25 years; (45)   The provision or performance of goods or services for the purpose of producing Class I renewable energy or Class II renewable energy, as those terms are defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51), at, or adjacent to, buildings owned by, or operations conducted by, the contracting unit, the entire price of which is to be established as a percentage of the resultant savings in energy costs, for a term not to exceed 15 years; provided, however, that a contract shall be entered into only subject to and in accordance with guidelines promulgated by the Board of Public Utilities establishing a methodology for computing energy cost savings and energy generation costs; (46)  A power supply contract, as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2015, c.129 (C.40A:66-3), between a member municipality as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2015, c.129 (C.40A:66-3), and the municipal shared services energy authority established pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2015, c.129 (C.40A:66-1 et al.) to meet the electric power needs of its members, for the lease, operation, or management of electric generation within a member municipality's corporate limits and franchise area or the purchase of electricity, or the purchase of fuel for generating units for a term not to exceed 40 years; (47)  A contract entered into pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.2006, c.46 (C.30:9-23.20) between a county hospital authority and a manager for the management, operation, and maintenance of a hospital owned by the authority or the county for a term not to exceed 20 years, provided, however, that a contract entered into pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.2006, c.46 (C.30:9-23.20) may be renewed for two additional periods, not to exceed five years each; and (48)  (a)  A lease agreement that provides for the use, lease, lease-back, acquisition, operation, or maintenance of ferry boats and related facilities and services, for a period not to exceed 20 years, except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, "related facilities and services" includes, but is not limited to, docks and terminals, parking facilities, intermodal facilities, ingress and egress to the parking and terminal facilities, and the provision of goods and services to the public, provided that a contract for the provision or performance of such goods or services is related to ferry services and requires: (1)  a total capital expenditure exceeding $300,000, as certified by the chief financial officer of the contracting unit, including but not limited to capital expenditures made by the lessee; or (2)  a capital improvement that has a life expectancy upon completion exceeding 20 years, as certified by the chief financial officer of the contracting unit. (b)  A lease agreement for a capital improvement under subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) of this subsection may be awarded for a period not to exceed 50 years. (c)   Each worker employed in a construction project under a contract executed pursuant to this subsection shall be paid not less than the prevailing wage rate for the worker's craft or trade as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.). Any contract for services other than professional services, the statutory length of which contract is for three years or less, may include provisions for no more than one two-year, or two one-year, extensions, subject to the following limitations: a. The contract shall be awarded by resolution of the governing body upon a finding by the governing body that the services are being performed in an effective and efficient manner; b. No contract shall be extended so that it runs for more than a total of five consecutive years; c. Any price change included as part of an extension shall be based upon the price of the original contract as cumulatively adjusted pursuant to any previous adjustment or extension and shall not exceed the change in the index rate for the 12 months preceding the most recent quarterly calculation available at the time the contract is renewed; and d. The terms and conditions of the contract remain substantially the same. All multiyear leases and contracts entered into pursuant to this section, including any two-year or one-year extensions, except contracts involving the supplying of electricity for the purpose of lighting public streets and contracts for thermal energy authorized pursuant to subsection (1) above, construction contracts authorized pursuant to subsection (9) above, contracts for the provision or performance of goods or services or the supplying of equipment to promote energy conservation through the production of Class I renewable energy or Class II renewable energy authorized pursuant to subsection (45) above, contracts for water supply services or for a water supply facility, or any component part or parts thereof authorized pursuant to subsection (16), (30), (31), (34), (35), (37), or (43) above, contracts for resource recovery services or a resource recovery facility authorized pursuant to subsection (17) above, contracts for the sale of energy produced by a resource recovery facility authorized pursuant to subsection (18) above, contracts for wastewater treatment services or for a wastewater treatment system or any component part or parts thereof authorized pursuant to subsection (19), (36), (37), or (43) above, contracts for the operation and maintenance of a stormwater management system authorized pursuant to subsection (37) above, and contracts for the purchase of electricity or administrative or dispatching services related to the transmission of electricity authorized pursuant to subsection (24) above, contracts for the purchase of electricity generated from a power production facility that is fueled by methane gas authorized pursuant to subsection (44) above, and power supply contracts authorized pursuant to subsection (46) respectively, shall contain a clause making them subject to the availability and appropriation annually of sufficient funds as may be required to meet the extended obligation, or contain an annual cancellation clause. The Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations concerning the methods of accounting for all contracts that do not coincide with the fiscal year. All contracts shall cease to have effect at the end of the contracted period and shall not be extended by any mechanism or provision, unless in conformance with the "Local Public Contracts Law," P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-1 et seq.), except that a contract may be extended by mutual agreement of the parties to the contract when a contracting unit has commenced rebidding prior to the time the contract expires or when the awarding of a contract is pending at the time the contract expires.2 (cf: P.L.2019, c.79, s.1) 1[2. The governing body of a local unit shall ensure that all fire vehicles and apparatus, purchased or leased pursuant to N.J.S.40A:2-22, adhere to the nationally recognized industry standards set forth in National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) Standard 1911 for the inspection, maintenance, testing, and retirement of in-service emergency vehicles, or other internationally recognized standard for automobile fire fighting apparatus and equipment.]1 1[3. The Commissioner of Community Affairs, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Fire Safety, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations as necessary to effectuate the provisions of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).]1 1[4.] 2[3.1] 4.2  This act shall take effect immediately.